District of Columbia statutes.
8-1821.02

Commercial pet care facilities; rulemaking.

(a)

No person shall operate a commercial pet care facility without first obtaining a basic business license with an Inspected Sales and Services license endorsement pursuant to Title 47. The Mayor shall issue rules to establish the standards for the care and management of animals in a commercial pet care facility.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “commercial pet care facility” means a facility that provides day or overnight boarding, or provides pet-related services, including feeding, exercise, training, bathing, or grooming, but does not include an animal facility as defined in § 3-502 [repealed] or a licensed pet shop.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 202, 55 DCR 9186